Utah statutes.
76-1-301.5.   Time limitations for prosecution of misusing public money, falsification or alteration of government records, and bribery.

(1)  A prosecution for misusing public money, falsification or alteration of government records, or for a bribery offense shall be commenced within two years after facts constituting the offense have been reported to a prosecutor having responsibility and jurisdiction to prosecute the offense.

(2) This section does not shorten the limitation of actions under Section 76-1-302 or Subsection 76-1-303(3).



Amended by Chapter 208, 2002 General Session

